Illinois, session 104th, HB2107.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Recovery and Mental Health Tax Credit Act 5is amended by changing Section 3-1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 50/3-1)7    Sec. 3-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Recovery and Mental Health Tax Credit Act. References in this 9Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 102-1053, eff. 6-10-22.)